Utah statutes.
26A-1-117.   Funding of departments -- Tax levies.

(1) Counties involved in the establishment and operation of local health departments shall fund the local health departments with appropriations from the General Fund, from the levy of a tax, or in part by an appropriation and in part by a levy under Section 17-53-221.

(2)  A local health department may be funded as provided by law from:

(a)  local, state, and federal funds within local levy ceilings;

(b)  a separate ceiling exempt tax under Section 59-2-911, which may not exceed .0004 per dollar of taxable value of taxable property; or

(c)  in part by each.

(3)  Local funds from either tax source shall be appropriated by the local governing authorities of the counties participating in the local health department.



Amended by Chapter 249, 2002 General Session

